Utah statutes.
53-1-105.   Rulemaking -- Adjudicative proceedings -- Meetings.

The commissioner and the department and its boards, councils, divisions, and offices shall comply with the procedures and requirements of:

(1)  Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, in their rulemaking;

(2)  Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, in their adjudicative proceedings; and

(3)  Title 52, Chapter 4, Open and Public Meetings Act, in their meetings.

